apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="aborcëjn/y__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__jasny"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/ąb__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãba</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbòwi</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąb</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbie</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbie</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbã</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ãbem</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąb</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbów</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbóm</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbë</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbach</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbë</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbama</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ãbë</l>
          <r>ąb<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Kòrej/a__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zemi/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ząb"><i>z</i><par n="z/ąb__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zemia"><i>zemi</i><par n="zemi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kòreja"><i>Kòrej</i><par n="Kòrej/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kòreja" r="LR"><p><l>Korej</l><r>Kòrej</r></p><par n="Kòrej/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="telewizëjny"><i>telewizëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teòreticzny"><i>teòreticzn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teritorialny"><i>teritorialn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gwësny"><i>gwësn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zôpadny"><i>zôpadn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cëzy"><i>cëz</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="czôrny"><i>czôrn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kùlturny"><i>kùlturn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="techniczny"><i>techniczn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nieznóny"><i>nieznón</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slédny"><i>slédn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="administracëjny"><i>administracëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atrakcëjny"><i>atrakcëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="edicëjny"><i>edicëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="federacëjny"><i>federacëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="instalacëjny"><i>instalacëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kòmercëjny"><i>kòmercëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kònkùrencëjny"><i>kònkùrencëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maksymalizacëjny"><i>maksymalizacëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zwóny"><i>zwón</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="òbserwacëjny"><i>òbserwacëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proaborcëjny"><i>proaborcëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aborcëjny"><i>aborcëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prowòkacëjny"><i>prowòkacëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="redachcëjny"><i>redachcëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rekreacëjny"><i>rekreacëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tradicëjny"><i>tradicëjn</i><par n="aborcëjn/y__adj"/></e>
